Utah statutes.
58-78-102.   Definitions.

In addition to the definitions in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the Vocational Rehabilitation Counselors Licensing Board created in Section 58-78-201.

(2)  "Licensed vocational rehabilitation counselor" means an individual licensed under this chapter who is engaged in the practice of providing vocational rehabilitation services.

(3)  "Practice of providing vocational rehabilitation services" means rendering or offering to an individual, group, organization, or the general public vocational rehabilitation services:

(a)  in public or private practice;

(b)  for compensation; and

(c)  involving the application of principles, methods, or procedures of the vocational rehabilitation counseling profession, which include:

(i)  vocational assessment;

(ii)  vocational rehabilitation counseling and guidance;

(iii)  vocational and other training services;

(iv)  self-employment plans;

(v)  job analysis; and

(vi)  job placement.

